Louisiana, session 2026, SB131.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:21 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§21. Limitations on disciplinary proceedings by professional or occupational boards
and commissions; recovery of attorney fees and costs
A.(1) Unless a special law is applicable, no proceeding of any kind may be
initiated by a professional or occupational board or commission as follows:
(a) If the nature of the complaint is based on negligence or gross negligence,
no proceeding may be initiated after two years from discovery by the complainant.
However, under no circumstances shall such a proceeding be initiated more than five
years from the date of the act or omission.
(b) If the nature of the complaint is based on an intentional act or omission,
no proceeding may be initiated after two years from discovery by the complainant.
However, under no circumstances shall such a proceeding be initiated more than five
years from the date of the act or omission.
(c) If the nature of the complaint is based on fraud, no proceeding may be
initiated after two years from discovery by the complainant.
(d) If the nature of the complaint is based on a license or rules violation, no
proceeding may be initiated after five years from the date of the act or omission.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 131 ENROLLED
(2) In all cases where a complaint is filed with a professional or occupational
board or commission, the board or commission shall notify the licensee who is
specifically named in the complaint as the subject of the complaint in writing of the
complaint within six months after the filing of the complaint or be barred from
further action thereon. The board or commission shall hold any required hearing
within six months after the notice of the hearing, but this period may be interrupted
by the filing of procedural motions or suspended as provided in Paragraph (3) of this
Subsection.
(3) The time periods provided in this Subsection are suspended during the
pendency of a legal action involving the licensee as a party or witness if the
complaint arises from the same facts giving rise to the legal action or arises from the
licensee's activities in the legal action. For the purposes of this Subsection, "legal
action" includes litigation, arbitration, mediation, administrative proceeding, or other
disciplinary proceeding.
B. The provisions of this Section Subsection A of this Section shall not
apply to the following:
(1) The Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners.
(2) The Louisiana State Board of Dentistry.
(3) A certified public accountant.
(4) Repealed by Acts 2023, No. 381, §2, eff. August 1, 2023.
(5) The Louisiana State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors.
(6) The Louisiana Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and
Audiology.
(7) The Louisiana Board of Pharmacy.
(8) The Louisiana State Board of Nursing.
(9) The Louisiana State Board of Social Work Examiners.
(10) The Louisiana Physical Therapy Board.
(11) The Louisiana State Board of Practical Nurse Examiners.
C. The provisions of Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section with respect to the time
of hearing only shall not apply to the following:
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 131 ENROLLED
(1) The Louisiana Professional Engineering and Land Surveying Board.
(2) The State Board of Architectural Examiners.
D.(1) When a professional or occupational board initiates a disciplinary
proceeding against a licensee and the final disposition of the proceeding results
in a consent order, judgment, or finding in which the licensee is the prevailing
party, the board shall not collect from the licensee any attorney fees or costs
incurred by the board after a written offer of judgment.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, a licensee is deemed the prevailing
party when either of the following occurs:
(a) The licensee made a written offer of judgment, and the matter is
subsequently terminated, dismissed, or resolved without an adverse finding
against the licensee.
(b)(i) The consent order, judgment, or finding results in a disposition
more favorable to the licensee than the terms previously offered by the licensee
pursuant to this Subsection.
(ii) A result is considered more favorable to the licensee under any of the
following circumstances:
(aa) The licensee offered a suspension period, and the final consent
order, judgment, or finding imposes a suspension period shorter than or equal
to that offered by the licensee.
(bb) The licensee offered a probationary period, and the final consent
order, judgment, or finding imposes a probationary period shorter than or
equal to that offered by the licensee.
(cc) The licensee offered payment of a monetary fine, and the final
consent order, judgment, or finding imposes only a monetary fine in an amount
less than or equal to that offered by the licensee.
(dd) The licensee offered a suspension of licensure, and the final consent
order, judgment, or finding imposes no suspension of licensure, regardless of
whether the final disposition includes a fine, probation, or both. For purposes
of this Subitem, one day of suspension shall be deemed equivalent to fifteen days
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 131 ENROLLED
of probation when comparing disciplinary sanctions that include both
suspension and probationary periods.
(ee) The final consent order, judgment, or finding imposes a combined
suspension and probationary period that is less severe than or equal to that
offered by the licensee. For purposes of this Subitem, one day of suspension
shall be deemed equivalent to fifteen days of probation when comparing
disciplinary sanctions that include both suspension and probationary periods.
(3) The provisions of this Subsection supersede any agency rule,
regulation, custom, or practice governing the payment of attorney fees and costs
to the extent that such rule, regulation, custom, or practice is less favorable to
the licensee.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.